Maryland, session 2025, HB0896.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0896*

HOUSE BILL 896
Article – State Government
20–701.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(c) “Discriminatory housing practice” means an act that is prohibited under §
20–705, § 20–705.1, § 20–706, § 20–707, or § 20–708 of this subtitle.
20–705.1.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION, “INCOME–BASED HOUSING SUBSIDY” MEANS
RECURRING MONETARY ASSISTANCE TO A LANDLORD FROM A GOVERNMENTAL
ENTITY OR NONPROFIT ORGANIZATION THAT IS INTENDED TO DEFRAY, IN WHOLE
OR IN PART, A TENANT’S RENT OBLIGATION.
(2) “INCOME–BASED HOUSING SUBSIDY” INCLUDES LOW–INCOME
HOUSING ASSISTANCE CERTIFICATES AND VOUCHERS ISSUED UNDER THE UNITED
STATES HOUSING ACT OF 1937.
(B) EXCEPT AS AUTHORIZED UNDER FEDERAL LAW, A LANDLORD OR
RESIDENTIAL RENTAL PROPERTY THAT USES FINANCIAL INFORMATION, INCLUDING
CREDIT HISTORY, AS PART OF A PROSPECTIVE TENANT’S RENTAL APPLICATION MAY
NOT REFUSE TO RENT TO A PROSPECTIVE TENANT WHO PAYS RENT WITH THE
ASSISTANCE OF AN INCOME–BASED HOUSING SUBSIDY ON THE BASIS OF THE
PROSPECTIVE TENANT’S INCOME, CREDIT SCORE, LACK OF CREDIT SCORE, OR
ADVERSE CREDIT HISTORY.
(C) NOTWITHSTANDING SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION, A LANDLORD
THAT RECEIVES FUNDING FROM A GOVERNMENTAL ENTITY, A
QUASI–GOVERNMENTAL ENTITY, OR A NONPROFIT ORGANIZATION THAT REQUIRES
INCOME QUALIFICATION FOR TENANTS IN INCOME–RESTRICTED RENTAL UNITS MAY
COLLECT FINANCIAL INFORMATION FROM A PROSPECTIVE TENANT IF THE
COLLECTION OF FINANCIAL INFORMATION IS A CONDITION OF THE FUNDING.
20–1020.
(a) In this part the following words have the meanings indicated.
(e) “Discriminatory housing practice” means an act that is prohibited under §
20–705, § 20–705.1, § 20–706, § 20–707, or § 20–708 of this title.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.